Utah statutes.
57-16-13.   Abandonment.
Abandonment of a mobile home space and a mobile home within a mobile home park
is presumed in either of the following situations:
(1) (a)  the resident or occupant of the mobile home has not notified the park
that the resident or occupant will be absent from the mobile home space or
mobile home, and the resident or occupant fails to pay rent within 45 days
after the due date; and
(b) the mobile home park owner has no reasonable evidence, other than the
presence of the resident's or occupant's personal property, that the resident
or occupant is continuing to occupy the mobile home space and the mobile home;
or
(2) (a)  the resident or occupant of the mobile home has not notified the park
that the resident or occupant will be absent from the mobile home space where
the mobile home is located, and the resident or occupant fails to pay rent
when due; and
(b)  the resident's or occupant's personal property has been removed from the
mobile home, and there is no reasonable evidence that the resident or occupant
is occupying the mobile home space or mobile home.
